New Jersey, session 222, S2991.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.   a. As used in this act, qualifying child care worker means an educator or staff member who is employed, for a minimum of 20 hours per week, by a licensed child care center or registered family child care provider. b.    Notwithstanding the provisions of any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, a qualifying child care worker shall be eligible for child care services through the States subsidized child care assistance program to the same extent as any other participant in the program, regardless of the familys annual household income. c.     The Commissioner of Human Services shall establish a process by which the Department of Human Services shall confirm that a qualifying child care worker satisfies the employment criteria required to access the benefit established pursuant to this section. d.    The commissioner shall apply for such State plan amendments or waivers as may be necessary to implement the provisions of this act and to continue to secure federal financial participation for subsidized child care services for eligible families under the Child Care and Development Block Grant Act of 1990, Pub.L.97-35 (42 U.S.C. s.9857 et seq.), as amended. 2.   The Commissioner of Human Services shall adopt such rules and regulations pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.) as are necessary to carry out the purposes of this act. 3.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the fourth month next following the date of enactment, but the Commissioner of Human Services may take such anticipatory administrative action in advance thereof as may be necessary for the implementation of this act.